California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(c) The current and projected budget, by segment or contract, for all project phase costs.

(d) Expenditures to date, by segment or contract, for all project phase costs.

(e) A comparison of the current and projected work schedule and the baseline schedule contained in the California High-Speed Rail Program Revised 2012 Business Plan.

(f) A summary of milestones achieved during the prior two-year period and milestones expected to be reached in the coming two-year period.

(g) Any issues identified during the prior two-year period and actions
 taken to address those issues.

(h) A thorough discussion of risks to the project and steps taken to mitigate those risks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 2.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

185033.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Merced to Bakersfield segment” means a 171-mile electrified dual-track segment that is usable for high-speed rail service in the central valley from Merced to Bakersfield, with a new combined station in downtown Merced, and connections to the Amtrak San Joaquins and the Altamont Corridor Express.

(2) “Phase 1 System” means Phase 1 of the high-speed train project described in Section 2704.04 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) (1) As part of the project update report that is due on or before March 1, 2023, pursuant to
 Section 185033.5, the authority shall develop schedules related to the delivery of all of the following tasks:

(A) Completion of the 119-mile dual track segment from Madera to Poplar Avenue, which means Avenue 19 in the County of Madera to one mile north of the Tulare-Kern county line southward to north of Bakersfield, currently near Poplar Avenue.

(B) Completion of right-of-way, planning, and advance engineering for extensions to Merced and Bakersfield.

(C) Completion of an agreement or agreements between the state, the San Joaquin Joint Powers Authority, the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission, and the authority that details the role of each in planning, constructing, and funding the connection in the City of Merced.

(D) Completion of an agreement or
 agreements between the state, the San Joaquin Joint Powers Authority, the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission, and the authority covering the planning, funding, and operation of the proposed high-speed rail services from Merced to Bakersfield and the authority and approval for the San Joaquin Joint Powers Authority to contract for the operation of the high-speed rail services.

(E) Provision of an updated cost estimate with a stated probability level, or levels, of its ongoing contracts and for the work it is funding and managing that is required to complete the Merced to Bakersfield segment extensions.

(F) Completion of a funding plan that includes any additional federal funding awards for the Merced to Bakersfield segment.

(G) Additional milestones required for the completion of the Merced to Bakersfield segment
 and the full Phase 1 System pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (F), inclusive.

(2) The delivery schedules developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be included and updated in each subsequent business plan adopted pursuant to Section 185033 and project update report prepared pursuant to Section 185033.5.

(c) (1) In order to demonstrate reasonable likelihood of adequate funding to complete the Merced to Bakersfield segment, the authority shall provide all of the following information in the project update report that is due on or before March 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 185033.5:

(A) Estimated and actual civil works costs of the Merced to Bakersfield segment.

(B) Estimated and actual right-of-way, acquisitions, utilities, and other
 third-party agreement costs.

(C) Estimates of contract costs, including contingencies to cover change orders.

(D) Other costs, estimated and actual, including, but not limited to, rolling stock, interim use, and stations.

(E) Costs reported in a manner than can be comparable across reports.

(F) Updates on the authority’s progress on achieving project milestones, as established in the project update report or the business plan adopted pursuant to Section 185033.

(G) Funding commitments beyond the Merced to Bakersfield segment, and spending to meet those commitments to date, including funding sources used to meet identified funding commitments.

(2) The information specified in paragraph (1) shall be included and updated in each subsequent business plan adopted pursuant to Section 185033 and project update report prepared pursuant to Section 185033.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 8.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

185033.8.

(a) As part of the business plan that is due on or before May 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 185033, the authority shall provide a detailed funding plan for the Merced to Bakersfield segment that includes all of the following information:

(1) An updated estimate of the funding gap for completing the segment.

(2) A strategy for addressing the funding gap that includes all of the following:

(A) An itemized list of anticipated funds by source.

(B) A timeline describing when each source of funds
 must be received in order to meet the authority’s schedule for segment completion.

(C) The estimated project delays that would result if any funding source fails to materialize, and a discussion of how work could be resequenced to minimize these delays.

(D) An assessment of the likelihood that each proposed source of funding will materialize, including the identification of any major risks for obtaining the funding and a plan for mitigating those risks.

(3) Options for initiating service on the segment described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 185033.7 and the estimated schedule and costs associated with the service.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Merced to Bakersfield segment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 185033.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 81, Sec. 1.   (AB 377)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

185034.

The authority may do any of the following:

(1) Conduct engineering and other studies related to the selection and acquisition of rights-of-way and the selection of a franchisee, including, but not limited to, environmental impact studies, socioeconomic impact studies, and financial feasibility studies.

(2) Evaluate alternative high-speed rail technologies, systems and operators, and select an appropriate high-speed rail system.

(3) Establish criteria for the award of a franchise.

(4) Accept grants, fees, and allocations from the state, from political subdivisions of the state or from the federal government, foreign governments, and private sources.

(5) Select a proposed franchisee, a proposed route, and proposed terminal sites.

(6) Enter into contracts with public and private entities for the preparation of the plan.

(7) Prepare a detailed financing plan, including any necessary taxes, fees, or bonds to pay for the construction of the high-speed train network.

(8) Develop a proposed high-speed rail financial plan, including necessary taxes, bonds, or both, or other indebtedness, and submit the plan to the Legislature and to the Governor.

(9) Keep the public informed of its activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

185034.5.

For purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, each individual who is selected by the authority to serve in a peer review capacity to the authority shall be deemed to be a designated employee of the authority, and the authority shall be deemed to be the appointing power. Statements required to be filed pursuant to Section 87302 of the Government Code shall be filed with the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 626, Sec. 2.   (AB 41)   Effective September 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

185035.

(a) The authority shall establish an independent peer review group for the purpose of reviewing the planning, engineering, financing, and other elements of the authority’s plans and issuing an analysis of appropriateness and accuracy of the authority’s assumptions and an analysis of the viability of the authority’s financing plan, including the funding plan for each corridor required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2704.08 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) The peer review group shall include all of the following:

(1) Two individuals with education and experience in the
 planning and construction
 of large transportation systems, such as high-speed rail, or highway systems with similar characteristics, designated by the Treasurer.

(2) Two individuals, one with experience in engineering and construction of high-speed rail or similar large infrastructure projects and one with experience in project planning and
 finance, designated by the Controller.

(3) One representative from a financial services or financial consulting firm who shall not have been a contractor or subcontractor of the authority for the previous three years, designated by the Director of Finance.

(4) One representative with experience in environmental planning, designated by the Secretary of Transportation.

(5) Two individuals with experience providing or governing intercity or commuter passenger train services
 in California, designated by the Secretary of Transportation.

(c) The peer review group shall evaluate the authority’s funding plans and prepare its independent judgment as to the feasibility and reasonableness of the plans, appropriateness of assumptions, analyses, and estimates, and any other observations or evaluations it deems necessary.

(d) The authority shall provide the peer review group any and all information that the peer review group may request to carry out its responsibilities.

(e) The peer review group shall report its findings and conclusions to the Legislature no later than 60 days after receiving the plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 12, Sec. 3.   (AB 95)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

185036.

Upon approval by the Legislature, by the enactment of a statute, or approval by the voters of a financial plan providing the necessary funding for the construction of a high-speed network, the authority may do any of the following:

(a) Enter into contracts with private or public entities for the design, construction, and operation of high-speed trains. The contracts may be separated into individual tasks or segments or may include all tasks and segments, including a design-build or design-build-operate contract.

(b) Acquire rights-of-way through purchase or eminent domain.

(c) Issue debt, secured by pledges of state funds, federal grants, or project revenues. The pledge of state funds shall be limited to those funds expressly authorized by statute or voter-approved initiatives.

(d) Enter into cooperative or joint development agreements with local governments or private entities.

(e) Set fares and schedules.

(f) Relocate highways and utilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 208.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

185036.1.

(a) The authority shall make every effort to purchase high-speed train rolling stock and related equipment that are manufactured in California, as defined in subdivision (b), consistent with federal law and any other applicable provision of state law.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Manufactured in California” means that the rolling stock and related equipment are manufactured in whole or in substantial part within California or that the majority of the component parts of the rolling stock and
 related equipment were manufactured in whole or in substantial part in California.

(2) “Manufactured” means an activity of converting or conditioning property by changing the form, composition, quality, or character of the property for ultimate sale at retail or use in the manufacturing of a product to be ultimately sold at retail.

(c) Nothing in this section creates a private right of action in any civil litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 413, Sec. 1.   (AB 16)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185036.2.

Notwithstanding the authority’s ability to delegate power to the executive director pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 185024, a contract change order with a value greater than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be approved by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   (AB 2879)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

185036.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “Merced to Bakersfield segment” has the same meaning as defined in Section 185033.7.

(b) Before submitting a federal grant application for funding for implementation of the high-speed rail project, the authority shall notify the chairpersons of the relevant committees of both houses of the Legislature of the authority’s intent to apply for federal funding. This notification shall include, but not is limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Amount of federal funding for which the authority is applying.

(2) Activities for which the funding will be used, including whether
 the planned activities are located on the Merced to Bakersfield segment.

(3) The expected source and level of state matching funding required for a successful grant application.

(4) If there is expected matching state funding that would be spent outside the Merced to Bakersfield segment, the notification shall include an explanation of the need for the proposed spending and how it is consistent with the Legislature’s stated goal of prioritizing the construction of the Merced to Bakersfield segment, as described in Section 1 of the act adding this section.

(c) (1) Before releasing a request for proposals (RFP) after June 1, 2022, the authority shall notify the chairpersons of the relevant committees of both houses of the Legislature of the authority’s intent to release the RFP if it would involve
 any of the following:

(A) Track and systems.

(B) Leasing or procurement of train sets.

(C) Any work with an estimated value of over two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) or a duration of 10 years or more.

(2) The notification required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but not is limited to, all of the following information:

(A) Expected value and duration of the contract.

(B) Activities for which the authority will be contracting.

(C) How the proposed contract is consistent with the Legislature’s stated goal of prioritizing the completion of
 the Merced to Bakersfield segment, as described in Section 1 of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 9.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

185037.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for any project along the high-speed rail network, the authority may contract with the department to perform project design and engineering services, including construction inspection services.

(b) For purposes of this section, “project design and engineering services, including construction inspection services” means preliminary engineering, planning, prebid services, right-of-way acquisition, preparation of environmental documents, preparation of plans, specifications, and estimates, construction inspection including surveying and materials testing, quality control inspection including highway and utility relocation, and grade separations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 267, Sec. 3.   Effective August 26, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

185038.

Any legal or equitable action brought against the authority shall be brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento. For purposes of this section, subdivision (1) of Section 401 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 696, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Rights-of-Way [185040. - 185045.]

185040.

(a) If the authority determines that real property or an interest therein, previously or hereafter acquired by the state for high-speed rail purposes, is no longer necessary for those purposes, the authority may sell or exchange the real property or interest therein at fair market value in the manner set forth in this section.

(b) Before selling the real property or interest therein in any manner authorized under this section, the authority shall send notification by certified mail to the last known owner of the real property or interest therein at his or her last known address, advising him or her that the real property or interest therein will be offered for sale. The authority shall not sell the real property or interest therein until at least 30 days after the
 notification has been sent.

(c) The authority may sell the property to an adjoining landowner if it makes either of the following findings:

(1) (A) That the property is of a size or shape that it is below the average normal standard size and shape of other privately owned properties in the immediate neighborhood, and that if the property were sold to other than the adjoining owner, it would give rise to a land use development thereof that would be below and not consistent with the normal land use of other properties in that neighborhood, (B) that the sale of the property to a party other than the adjoining owner may cause an undue or unfair hardship to the adjoining owner in the normal land use development or operation of his or her property, (C) that the property considered as part of the adjoining property would have a higher and better use than under
 separate ownership, and (D) that the fair market value of the property considered as part of the adjoining property would be higher than under separate ownership.

(2) (A) That the sale of the excess parcel to other than the adjoining owner would deprive the adjoining owner of an existing vested right of access to a public highway and thereby create a possible cause of action against the authority or the state.

(B) A sale to an adjoining landowner pursuant to this subdivision may be by contract to sell or trust deed. The payment period in a contract of sale or sale by trust deed shall not extend longer than 10 years from the time the contract of sale or trust deed is executed, and a transaction involving a contract of sale or sale by trust deed to private parties shall require a downpayment of at least 30 percent of the purchase price.

(d) The authority may sell the property to municipalities or other local agencies at their request, without calling for competitive bids, at a price representing the fair market value thereof, and upon a determination that the intended use is for a public purpose.

(e) If it is improved property, the property may be sold to a former owner who has remained in occupancy or to a residential tenant of a tenure of five years or more with all rent obligations current or paid in full.

(f) Any real property or interest therein may in like manner be exchanged, either as whole or part consideration, for any other real property or interest therein as needed for high-speed rail purposes. This provision does not authorize exchanges where the value of the state-owned property exceeds the value of the property the authority seeks to
 acquire, unless the excess value is incidental and subdivision of the state-owned property, in order to produce a smaller parcel of equal value to the value of the property the authority seeks to acquire, would reduce the total value of the state-owned property.

(g) Except as otherwise provided in this section, property shall be sold either by receipt of competitive sealed bids or at public auction, whichever method is determined by the authority to be more likely to achieve the higher sales price.

(h) Any payments received under this section for the sale of real property no longer necessary for high-speed rail purposes shall be deposited in the High-Speed Rail Property Fund created pursuant to Section 185045 and shall be available to the authority upon appropriation as provided in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 224.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

185041.

The authority may sell or lease excess right-of-way parcels to municipalities or other local agencies for public purposes, and may accept as all or part of the consideration for the sale or lease any substantial benefits the state will derive from the municipality or other local agency’s undertaking maintenance or landscaping costs that would otherwise be the obligation of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 132, Sec. 8.   (AB 481)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

185042.

The authority may lease nonoperating right-of-way areas to municipalities or other local agencies for public purposes, and may contribute toward the cost of developing local parks and other recreational facilities on those areas. The authority may accept as all or part of the consideration for the lease or for the state contribution any substantial benefits the state will derive from the municipality or other local agency’s undertaking maintenance or landscaping costs that would otherwise be the obligation of the state. Those leases shall contain a provision that whenever the leased land is needed for high-speed rail operating purposes the lease shall terminate. The authority is authorized to classify portions of high-speed rail rights-of-way as
 nonoperating.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 132, Sec. 8.   (AB 481)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

185044.

The authority may lease to public agencies or private entities or individuals for any term not to exceed 99 years the use of areas above or below operating rights-of-way and portions of property not currently being used as operating rights-of-way, subject to any reservations, restrictions, and conditions that it deems necessary to ensure adequate protection of the safety and adequacy of high-speed rail facilities and of abutting or adjacent land uses. Prior to entering into any lease, the authority shall determine that the proposed use is not in conflict with the zoning regulations of the local government concerned. The leases shall be made in accordance with procedures to be prescribed by the authority, except that, in the cases of leases with
 private entities or individuals, the leases shall be made only after competitive
 bidding. The possibilities of entering into the leases, and the consequent benefits to be derived therefrom, may be considered by the authority in designing and constructing the high-speed rail system. Revenues from the leases shall be deposited in the High-Speed Rail Property Fund created pursuant to Section 185045.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 132, Sec. 8.   (AB 481)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

185045.

The High-Speed Rail Property Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the deposit of revenue received from the sale, lease, or grant of any interest in or use of real property owned or managed by the High-Speed Rail Authority. Revenues in the fund shall be available to the authority, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for use in the development, improvement, and maintenance of the high-speed rail system, consistent with appropriate uses for each funding source.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 132, Sec. 8.   (AB 481)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Relocation of Utilities [185500. - 185511.]

185500.

(a) “High-speed rail property” means real property or an interest therein, including any right-of-way, previously or hereafter acquired by the state for high-speed rail purposes.

(b) “Person” means a natural person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, organization, limited liability company, or business trust, and includes any city, county, city and county, public corporation, or public district.

(c) “Utility” means any person maintaining a utility facility.

(d) “Utility facility” means any pole, pole line, pipe, pipeline, conduit, cable, aqueduct, or other
 structure or appurtenance thereof used for publicly or privately owned utility services or used by any mutual organization supplying water or telephone service to its members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185501.

(a) When the authority requires any utility to remove any utility facility lawfully maintained in the right-of-way of any high-speed rail property to a location entirely outside the high-speed rail property right-of-way, the authority shall pay the reasonable and necessary cost of the removal. This includes both the cost of removal and the cost of relocation to a new location outside of the high-speed rail property right-of-way.

(b) This section does not apply to the relocation of a utility facility from one point in a high-speed rail property to another point in that property, including relocation in any service road of the high-speed rail property or from one point of crossing of the high-speed rail
 property to another reasonable point of crossing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185502.

(a) When the authority requires a publicly owned utility to relocate within a high-speed rail property any utility facility lawfully maintained in that property that was not used for high-speed rail purposes at the time the utility facility was originally installed, the authority shall pay the cost of the relocation.

(b) When the authority requires a privately owned utility to relocate within a high-speed rail property any utility facility used solely to supply water, which facility is lawfully maintained in any high-speed rail property that was not used for high-speed rail purposes at the time that the utility facility was originally installed, the authority shall pay the cost of the relocation.

(c) When the authority requires a privately owned utility to relocate within a high-speed rail property any utility facility, other than one used solely to supply water, which facility is lawfully maintained in any high-speed rail property that was not used for high-speed rail purposes at the time the utility facility was originally installed, and it is established by the utility that the utility is not under express contractual obligation to relocate the utility facility at its own expense, the authority shall pay the cost of the relocation.

(d) A permit containing a contractual obligation that was accepted by the utility for maintenance or minor improvement of the facility after the property became high-speed rail property shall not constitute a contractual obligation to relocate a utility facility at its own expense within the meaning of this section.

(e) Publicly owned sewers and fire hydrants and any street lighting structure, whether publicly or privately owned, in any high-speed rail property shall be relocated, where necessary, at the expense of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185503.

If the authority requires the relocation within the right-of-way of any utility facility more than once within a period of 10 years, the authority shall pay the cost of the second relocation and any subsequent relocation within the 10-year period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185504.

(a) In any case in which the authority is required under the provisions of this chapter to pay the cost of removal or relocation of any utility facility, it shall be entitled to the following credits:

(1) In the amount of any betterment to the utility facility resulting from the removal or relocation, not in excess of the cost of the increased capacity of the facility.

(2) The salvage value of any materials or parts salvaged and retained by the utility.

(3) If a new utility facility or portion of that facility is constructed to accomplish the removal or relocation, an
 allowance of an amount equal to the same proportion of the original cost of the displaced utility facility or portion of that facility as the age of the facility bears to the normal expected life of the facility.

(b) A credit shall not be allowed against any portion of the cost that is otherwise chargeable to the utility.

(c) A credit allowance for age shall not be applied to publicly owned sewers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185505.

(a) The authority and any utility required to remove a utility facility or to relocate any utility facility may, by agreement, provide for the respective amounts of the cost to be borne by each. The authority may, without prejudice to its rights under Section 185506, advance the cost of removal or relocation, and, if the authority advances that cost, it is the duty of the utility to move its facilities as soon as reasonably possible so as not to delay high-speed rail construction. In the case of any utility that is not financially able to bear the costs of removal or relocation, the authority may by agreement provide for the work to be done on condition that the utility’s portion of the costs be repaid to the authority over a period of time not exceeding 10
 years.

(b) Either party may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an adjudication as to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party under any contract entered into by the parties at any time within four years after the cause of action first arose. The cause of action shall be deemed to arise at the time of the completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question, or at the time of a breach of the agreement by either party, whichever occurs first. The filing of a claim with a state agency shall not be deemed a condition precedent to the maintenance by the utility of an action under this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185506.

In the event of failure to reach an agreement as provided in Section 185505, the utility or the authority may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for apportionment of the cost between them in accordance with this chapter. This action shall be commenced within three years of the date of completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question. The filing of a claim with a state agency shall not be deemed a condition precedent to the maintenance by the utility of an action pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185507.

(a) The authority and any utility as defined in Section 185500 may enter into a contract providing for or apportioning the obligations and costs to be borne by each party as to either or both of the following subject matters:

(1) Any or all removals or relocations of utility facilities completed by the utility prior to the effective date of the contract as required by notice given by the authority when necessary to accommodate any or all state high-speed rail construction, where: (A) the obligations or costs to be borne by each party for a removal or relocation are in dispute; and (B) the claim of the utility is: (i) founded upon a removal or relocation completed by the utility not earlier than three
 years preceding the effective date of the contract; or (ii) involved in an action pending in a court of competent jurisdiction if the action was commenced within three years after completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question.

(2) Any or all removals or relocations of utility facilities to be undertaken or completed by the utility after the effective date of the contract as required by notice given by the authority when necessary to accommodate any or all state high-speed rail construction.

(b) Those provisions of a contract authorized in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) settling the claims of the parties in respect to removals or relocations of utility facilities completed by the utility prior to the effective date of the contract shall be irrevocable after the execution of the contract, unless changed or modified by mutual consent of the parties in writing.
 Either party may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction upon any of the provisions of the contract at any time within two years after the effective date of the contract, and the utility need not file a claim with a state agency as a condition precedent to the maintenance of an action under this subdivision.

(c) Those provisions of a contract dealing with removals or relocations of utility facilities to be undertaken or completed by the utility after the effective date of the contract, as authorized in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), shall be subject to the following limitations and requirements:

(1) While the contract remains in effect, the contract shall govern exclusively the determination of the obligations and costs to be borne by each party in regard to any removal or relocation covered by the contract and undertaken or completed by the utility after the
 effective date of the contract, whether notice of the necessity of the removal or relocation was given by the authority to the utility before or after the effective date of the contract. This chapter, as now or hereafter existing, and any and all other laws that would be applicable to the subject matter but for the contract shall not apply, except that laws may be referred to, retained, and made applicable by the contract. This paragraph shall not apply in the following circumstances:

(A) If, before the effective date of a contract entered into under this section, the parties executed an agreement in respect to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party as to a particular removal or relocation under a notice given by the authority, the provisions of such an agreement shall govern as to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party in respect to that particular removal or relocation.

(B) If a particular notice given by the authority before the effective date of a contract entered into under this section includes a determination that a removal or relocation is to be made at the expense of the utility, the utility shall be bound by that notice unless the utility advised the authority in writing of its disagreement with the determination within the time specified in an agreement then in effect between the authority and the utility in respect to the procedure to be followed in those cases, or, if there is no such agreement, within a reasonable time after receipt by the utility of the notice.

(2) Either party may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction for an adjudication as to the obligations and costs to be borne by each party under the contract at any time within four years after the cause of action first arose. The cause of action shall be deemed to
 arise at the time of the completion by the utility of the removal or relocation in question. The filing of a claim with a state agency shall not be deemed a condition precedent to the maintenance by the utility of an action under this paragraph.

(3) The contract shall terminate upon the repeal of this section, the repeal of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subdivision (c), or at the time or in the manner as may be provided in the contract. In the event of termination under this paragraph, the laws applicable to the subject matter of the contract existing at the time of termination shall thereafter govern, except that the terms of the contract shall continue to apply to removals or relocations required of the utility by the authority under notice mailed or delivered to the utility prior to the termination, whether work upon the removal or relocation has already commenced, is in progress, or has been
 completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185508.

A utility is entitled to a permit for such reasonable crossings of high-speed rail property as may be required for the proper discharge of the utility’s service to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185509.

The authority shall exercise reasonable discretion in acting on applications of utilities for permits to occupy high-speed rail property for longitudinal locations of facilities, as may be required for the proper discharge of their services to the public. The authority may, however, refuse to grant an application for a longitudinal installation that would be inconsistent with public safety or the continued unobstructed use of the high-speed rail property for rail or vehicular traffic, or for any type of utility structure inconsistent with the aesthetic values of any landscaped high-speed rail property within, or approaching within, one mile of the limits of any city.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185510.

The authority, in acting upon applications for utility permits, shall consider both the interests of the traveling public upon the high-speed rail property and the needs of consumers for utility services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

185511.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent the authority from making reasonable rules and regulations and requiring reasonable conditions in permits concerning the place, manner, and method of location of utility facilities in, under, over, or along high-speed rail property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 7.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 19.7. HIGH-SPEED RAIL AUTHORITY OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL [187000. - 187038.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [187000. - 187010.]

187000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that ensuring that information available to make fiscally responsible decisions about the project is accurate, current, and impartial is critical to better ensuring the success of the project and to meet the expectations of the state’s taxpayers and the intent of the Safe, Reliable High-Speed Passenger Train Bond Act for the 21st Century (Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 2704) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code).

(b) In establishing this division, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide decisionmakers with impartial information about how to proceed with the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 71, Sec. 10.   (SB 198)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

187010.
